District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-3931

Representations prohibited.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-219, § 32, 38 DCR 171
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 50, 43 DCR 530
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1242, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-3231.